test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-list_ad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
    tuššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuušâm
    tuššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuššá
    tálustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tálustâlâm
    tálvástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tálvástâlâm
    ucástâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ucástâđâm
    uhkáástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uhkáástâlâm
    uigâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uigâdâđâm
    uigâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uuigâm
    uináástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uináástâlâm
    ujostâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ujostâlâm
    usâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: usâdât
    usâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: usâstâlâm
    usâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: usâttâlâm
    utkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uuđhâm
    uuccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uusâm
    uuccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ocá
    uussâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: osá
    uvástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uvástâlâm
    uávuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uávuttâlâm
    uáđđáástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uáđđáástâlâm
    vaannâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vaanâm
    vaannâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: váná
    vaarrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vaarâm
    vaarrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: váárá
    vaattâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vaađâm
    vaibâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vaaibâm
    vaibâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: váibá
    vaigârdâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vaigârdâlâm
    vajâgâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vajâgâšâm
    vajâgâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vajâgâš
    valastâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: valaštâlâm
    valdâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: valdâttâlâm
    valgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vaalgâm
    valgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: válgá
    vannaastâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vannaastâlâm
    varriidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: varriidâđâm
    varriistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: varriistâlâm
    vaskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: váská
    vazzâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vaazâm
    važottâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: važottâlâm
    veeppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: veevâm
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: veerâm
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viärá
    veeđđâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: veeđâm
    velttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: veeltâm
    velttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viälttá
    večiruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: večirušâm
    vieggâsâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vieggâsâdâm
    viekkiistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viekkiistâlâm
    viennâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vienâm
    viennâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viäná
    vienâruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vienâruš
    vierriittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vierriittâlâm
    vierrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vierâm
    vierrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vierâi
    vierâlâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vierâlâtâm
    vierâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vierâttâlâm
    viessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viesâm
    vievâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vievâttâlâm
    vieškâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vieškâm
    vieškâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viäšká
    viežžâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viežâm
    viggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viigâm
    viggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viggá
    vigâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vigâdâđâm
    vihkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viihkâm
    vihkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vihká
    viillâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viilâm
    viillâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vilá
    viippâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viivâm
    viirrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viirâm
    viirrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: virá
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viišâm
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vi]á
    vijsástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vijsástâlâm
    vipšâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viipšâm
    visârdâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: visârdâlâm
    viälgádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viälgádâđâm
    viälgádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viälgádât
    viäluttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viäluttâlâm
    viärdádâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viärdádâlâm
    viärmádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viärmádâđâm
    vižástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vižástâlâm
    viššâluššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viššâlušâm
    vonâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vonâttâlâm
    vooijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: voojâm
    vooijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaja
    voonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: voonâm
    voonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vana
    vovdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: voovdâm
    vovdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vavda
    vuoidâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuoidâm
    vuoijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuojâm
    vuoijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuájá
    vuoiŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuoiŋâm
    vuoiŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuáiŋá
    vuojâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuojâdâđâm
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuolâm
    vuorjâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuorjâm
    vuorkkiistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuorkkiistâlâm
    vuorrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuorâm
    vuorrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuárá
    vuoškânjuššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuoškânjušâm
    vuoššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuošâm
    vuáimáštâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuáimáštâlâm
    vuáisádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuáisádât
    vuájudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuájudâđâm
    vuáruttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuáruttâlâm
    vájugâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vájugâšâm
    vájugâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vájugâš
    várdáástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: várdáástâlâm
    várdáástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: várdáástâl
    váruttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: váruttâđâm
    vázzálâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vázzáluuvčâm
    vázzálâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vázzáluš
    áhčááttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: áhčááttâlâm
    ájánâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ájánâd
    ájáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ájáttâlâm
    ánhástuššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ánhástušâm
    árvuttuššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: árvuttušâm
    árvuttâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: árvuttâšâm
    árvuštâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: árvuštâlâm
    ávhástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ávhástâlâm
    ávhâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ávhâstâlam
    äŋgiruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: äŋgirušâm
    äŋgirâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: äŋgirâšâm
    čaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čaavâm
    čaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čááhá
    šaammâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šaamâm
    šaammâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šáámá
    šaavvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šaavâm
    čaaŋŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čaaŋâm
    čaaŋŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čááŋá
    šalligâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šalligâšâm
    čalâččâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čalâččâđâm
    čarviistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čarviistâlâm
    čarŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čaarŋâm
    čarŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čárŋá
    časkâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: časkâttâlâm
    časkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čaaskâm
    časkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čáská
    čergâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čeergâm
    čergâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čiärgá
    čibástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čibástâlâm
    čiehâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čievâm
    čiehâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čiähá
    čiehčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čievčâm
    čielgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čiälgá
    čieppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čiepâm
    čieppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čiäppá
    čierâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čierâstâlâm
    čieskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čieskâm
    šiettuustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šiettuustâlâm
    šiettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šietâm
    šiettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šiättá
    čievčâstâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čievčâstâđâm
    čievčâstâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čievčâstât
    čievčâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čievčâttâl
    čievčâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čievčâttât
    čihtâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čiivtâm
    šipšâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šiipšâm
    čivgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čivgá
    čiähádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čiähádâđâm
    čiävluttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čiävluttâlâm
    čiŋâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čiŋâdâđâm
    čiŋâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čiŋâdât
    čiŋâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čiŋâttâlâm
    škaaijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: škaajâm
    šlaaviittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šlaaviittâlâm
    šlajâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šlajâttâlâm
    šlieđđâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šlieđâm
    šloggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šloogâm
    šloggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šlagga
    šloottâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šloođâm
    šloottâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šluátá
    šnikkáruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šnikkárušâm
    šnjuuđđâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šnjuuđâm
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šoodâm
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: herhis
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kävilin
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šadda
    čokkáástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čokkáástâlâm
    čokottâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čokottâlâm
    čolgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čoolgâm
    čolmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čoolmâm
    čolmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čalma
    čonâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čonâdâđâm
    čonâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čonâdât
    čonâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čonâttâđâm
    čoollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čoolâm
    šoollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šoolâm
    šoollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šala
    čoonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čoonâm
    čoonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čana
    čorostâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čorostâlâm
    čovgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čoovgâm
    čovgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čavga
    čovláttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čovláttâlâm
    šuimâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šuuimâm
    čulgâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čulgâdâđâm
    čulgâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čulgâdât
    čulgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuulgâm
    čulgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čolgá
    čuoccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuosâm
    čuoccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuácá
    čuohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuovâm
    čuoigâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuoigâstâlâm
    čuoigâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuoigâm
    čuoigâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuáigá
    čuoijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuojâm
    čuoijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuájá
    čuollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuolâm
    čuolmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuolmâm
    čuolmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuálmá
    čuolâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuolâdâđâm
    čuolâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuolâttâđâm
    čuoppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuopâm
    čuovvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuovâm
    čuovvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuává
    šuoŋŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuáŋá
    čurgiistâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čurgiistâđâm
    čurmâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čurmâdâđâm
    čurmâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čurmâdât
    čurmâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čurmâttâđâm
    čurmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuurmâm
    čurmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čormá
    čuuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuuvâm
    šuuvvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuvá
    čuáguttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuáguttâđâm
    čuárvuđâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuárvuđâđâm
    čuáskudâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuáskudâlâm
    čuáskudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuáskudâđâm
    čuáskudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuáskudât
    čuáskuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuáskuttâlâm
    čájádâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čájádâđâm
    čájáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čájáttâlâm
    čáráttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čáráttâlâm
    adaluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: adâluuvčâm
    adaluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: adaluhš
    falâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: falâluuvčâm
    falâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: falâluš
    hastâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hastâluuvčâm
    hastâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hastâlâhš
    áštáluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: áštáluuvčâm
    čulgâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čulgâluvčâm
